Alaska statutes. Title 8. Business and Professions.
Chapter 15. Behavior Analysts.

Effective dates. —

Section 3, ch. 41, SLA 2014, which enacted this chapter, took effect on September 16, 2014.

Sec. 08.15.010.
Practice of behavior analysis without license prohibited.

A person may not practice behavior analysis in this state without a license.

A person who practices behavior analysis in this state without a license is guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction is punishable by a fine of not more than $500, or by imprisonment for not more than six months, or by both.

History.

(§ 3 ch 41 SLA 2014)

Editor’s notes. —

Under sec. 6, ch. 41, SLA 2014, the licensing requirement in this section will not apply until September 16, 2016 “to a person who has been practicing behavior analysis in this state for at least three of the five years immediately preceding September 16, 2014, is certified by the Behavior Analyst Certification Board, Inc., and is practicing behavior analysis within the scope of that certification.”
See sec. 6, ch. 41, SLA 2014 in the 2014 Temporary and Special Acts for the complete applicability provisions for this section.

Sec. 08.15.020.
Qualifications for license.

The department shall issue a license to practice behavior analysis to a person who

applies to the department on a form provided by the department;

pays the fees established by the department;

has passed the Board Certified Behavior Analyst Examination offered by the Behavior Analyst Certification Board, Inc., or another examination approved by the department;

is currently certified by the Behavior Analyst Certification Board, Inc., or another certifying entity approved by the department;

furnishes evidence satisfactory to the department that the person has not engaged in conduct that is a ground for imposing disciplinary sanctions under AS

08.15.060

; and

has been fingerprinted and has provided the fees required by the Department of Public Safety under AS

12.62.160

for criminal justice information and a national criminal history record check; the fingerprints and fees shall be forwarded to the Department of Public Safety to obtain a report of criminal justice information under AS 12.62 and a national criminal history record check under AS

12.62.400

.

The department shall issue a license to practice as an assistant behavior analyst to a person who

applies to the department on a form provided by the department;

pays the fees established by the department;

has passed the Board Certified Assistant Behavior Analyst Examination offered by the Behavior Analyst Certification Board, Inc., or another examination approved by the department;

is currently certified by the Behavior Analyst Certification Board, Inc., or another certifying entity approved by the department;

furnishes evidence satisfactory to the department that the person has not engaged in conduct that is a ground for imposing disciplinary sanctions under AS

08.15.060

;

has been fingerprinted and has provided the fees required by the Department of Public Safety under AS

12.62.160

for criminal justice information and a national criminal history record check; the fingerprints and fees shall be forwarded to the Department of Public Safety to obtain a report of criminal justice information under AS 12.62 and a national criminal history record check under AS

12.62.400

; and

provides proof acceptable to the department that the person is directly supervised by a licensed behavior analyst.

History.

(§ 3 ch 41 SLA 2014)

Sec. 08.15.030.
Temporary license.

The department may issue a temporary license to practice behavior analysis in this state for 30 days or less in a calendar year if the person is licensed to practice behavior analysis in another state whose requirements to practice behavior analysis are substantially equivalent to the requirements of AS

08.15.020

.

History.

(§ 3 ch 41 SLA 2014)

Sec. 08.15.040.
Renewal of license.

The department may renew a license upon proof of continued certification by the Behavior Analyst Certification Board, Inc., or another certifying entity approved by the department.

History.

(§ 3 ch 41 SLA 2014)

Sec. 08.15.050.
Grounds for suspension, revocation, or refusal to issue a license.

The department may, after a hearing, impose a disciplinary sanction on a person licensed under this chapter when the department finds that the licensee

secured a license through deceit, fraud, or intentional misrepresentation;

engaged in deceit, fraud, or intentional misrepresentation in the course of providing professional services or engaging in professional activities;

advertised professional services in a false or misleading manner;

has been convicted of a felony or other crime that affects the licensee’s ability to continue to practice competently and safely;

failed to comply with this chapter, with a regulation adopted under this chapter, or with an order of the department;

continued to practice after becoming unfit because of

professional incompetence;

addiction or severe dependency on alcohol or a drug that impairs the licensee’s ability to practice safely;

physical or mental disability;

engaged in lewd or immoral conduct in connection with the delivery of professional service to patients.

History.

(§ 3 ch 41 SLA 2014)

Sec. 08.15.060.
Disciplinary sanctions.

When the department finds that a licensee is guilty of an offense under AS

08.15.050

, the department may impose the following sanctions singly or in combination:

permanently revoke the license to practice;

suspend the license for a determinate period of time;

censure the licensee;

issue a letter of reprimand to the licensee;

place the licensee on probationary status and require the licensee to

report regularly to the department on matters involving the basis of probation;

limit practice to those areas prescribed;

continue professional education until a satisfactory degree of skill has been reached in areas determined by the department to need improvement;

impose limitations or conditions on the practice of the licensee.

The department may withdraw probationary status of a licensee if it finds that the deficiencies that required the sanction have been remedied.

The department may summarily suspend a license before final hearing or during the appeals process if the department finds that the licensee poses a clear and immediate danger to the public health and safety if the licensee continues to practice. A licensee whose license is suspended under this section is entitled to a hearing conducted by the office of administrative hearings not later than seven days after the effective date of the order. The licensee may appeal the suspension after a hearing to a court of competent jurisdiction.

History.

(§ 3 ch 41 SLA 2014)

Sec. 08.15.070.
Exemptions.

This chapter does not apply to

a person licensed in this state performing behavior analysis within the scope of practice for which the person’s license was issued;

a student or trainee who is enrolled in a behavior analysis program approved by the department while performing duties under the program under the direct supervision of a person licensed under this chapter;

an individual who directly implements applied behavior analysis services, or family member implementing a behavior analysis plan within the home, who acts under the direction of a licensed behavior analyst or licensed assistant behavior analyst;

an applied animal behaviorist who practices exclusively with nonhumans;

a person who works in organizational behavior management;

a person supervised by a licensed behavior analyst who is gaining experience for certification by the Behavior Analyst Certification Board, Inc., or another certifying entity approved by the department.

History.

(§ 3 ch 41 SLA 2014)

Sec. 08.15.080.
Regulations.

The department shall adopt regulations to implement this chapter, including

continuing education requirements; and

standards for licensure by credentials.

History.

(§ 3 ch 41 SLA 2014)

Sec. 08.15.090.
Definitions.

In this chapter,

“behavior analysis” means the design, implementation, and evaluation of instructional and environmental modifications to produce socially significant improvements in human behavior, the empirical identification of functional relations between behavior and environmental factors, and the utilization of contextual factors, motivating operations, antecedent stimuli, positive reinforcement, and other consequences to help people develop new behaviors, increase or decrease existing behaviors, and engage in behaviors under specific environmental conditions; “behavior analysis” does not include psychological testing, diagnosis of a mental or physical disorder, or the practice of neuropsychology, psychotherapy, cognitive therapy, sex therapy, psychoanalysis, hypnotherapy, or long-term counseling;

“department” means the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development.

History.

(§ 3 ch 41 SLA 2014)